Maine, session 132, LD872.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 5 MRSA §1977 is enacted to read:
§1977. Artificial intelligence software
1. Office responsible for artificial intelligence software. The office shall create,
maintain and ensure the use of a list of approved artificial intelligence software or systems
for procurement and use by an agency, administrator, agent, employee or subcontractor of
the State.
2. Purchase and use of software employing artificial intelligence. The State,
including an agency, administrator, agent, employee or subcontractor of the State, may not
purchase or use software employing artificial intelligence unless the software:
A. Demonstrably conforms to ethical, legal and safety standards that ensure the
software can provide explicable and transparent decision making that guarantees that
the State maintains the sovereign, intentional control of the behavior of the software to
enable the State to fully comply with constitutional and legal mandates; and
B. Guarantees that a resident affected by a decision made by the State with the
assistance of the software is afforded the ability to secure due process and has an
accessible and affordable way to understand, review and appeal the decision.
3. Office to seek collaboration on use of artificial intelligence. The office shall
remain current on the status and advancement of artificial intelligence, in collaboration
with the Federal Government, other states, municipalities, other national governments and
other public and private organizations, to maintain access to ethical, legal, safe and
affordable forms of artificial intelligence to allow the State and residents of the State to:
A. Effectively fulfill governmental and civic obligations;
B. Guarantee rights under the United States Constitution and the Constitution of Maine
and state and federal laws, rules and regulations; and
C. Advance economic, cultural and environmental well-being.
4. Ethical, legal and safety standards. The Chief Information Officer shall establish
ethical, legal and safety standards under this section by rule pursuant to section 1982,
subsection 8.